Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.642.090

Primary contact.

(1) Each school district shall designate one person in the school district as the primary contact regarding school district compliance with this chapter. In addition to any other duties required by law and the school district, the primary contact must:

(a) Ensure that complaints of discrimination communicated to the school district are promptly investigated and resolved; and

(b) Communicate with the primary contact regarding the school district's policy and procedure prohibiting harassment, intimidation, and bullying under RCW 28A.600.477, and the primary contact regarding the school district's policies and procedures related to transgender students under RCW 28A.642.080.

(2) The primary contact may also serve as the primary contact regarding the school district's policy and procedure prohibiting harassment, intimidation, and bullying under RCW 28A.600.477 and the primary contact regarding the school district's policy and procedure related to transgender students under RCW 28A.642.080.

[ 2023 c 242 s 2.]